Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2262
Local long-term care ombudsman program and certified individual; treatment.

Any local long-term care ombudsman program or any individual certified by the office, whether an employee of the program or office or an unpaid volunteer of the program or office, shall be treated as a representative of the office.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 26;

Laws 2018, LB903, § 24.